Utah statutes.
58-78-502.   Unprofessional conduct.

"Unprofessional conduct" includes, in addition to the definition in Section 58-1-501 and as may be further defined by rule, engaging in an act or practice in a professional capacity which the licensee is not competent to perform through training or experience.



Enacted by Chapter 122, 2009 General Session

